District of Columbia statutes.
4-214.03

Funeral expenses — Indigent residents; wards of District.

The Mayor, pursuant to § 4-214.04, may provide for the payment of funeral and burial expenses of children in foster care and persons committed to the Youth Services Administration, Department of Human Services.

History

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 1403, 29 DCR 1060
Aug. 1, 1996, D.C. Law 11-152, § 101(c), 43 DCR 2978
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 7, 45 DCR 745

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 3-214.3.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(c) of the Emergency and Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-277, May 29, 1996, 43 DCR 2971).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 101(c) of the Fiscal Year 1996 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-335, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4256).